California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) The deficiency of a product when measured by one of the criteria specified in paragraph (2) may be sufficient to support a decision that the product should be deleted from, should not be added to, or should not be retained on, the list of medical supplies. However, the superiority of a product under one criterion may be sufficient to warrant the addition or retention of the product, notwithstanding a deficiency in another criterion.

(4) In the evaluation of the effectiveness of a product, the department may require the manufacturer, distributor, dispenser, or supplier to submit their products to testing by an independent laboratory. For the purposes of this section, “independent laboratory” means an analytical laboratory that is not a subsidiary of, affiliated with, or on retainer for, the manufacturer, distributor, dispenser, or
 supplier.

(c) The department may use Healthcare Common Procedure Code System codes or Universal Product Number codes for the processing and payment of incontinence medical supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 78.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14125.1.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this section shall govern the construction and meaning of the terms and phrases used in this article.

(a) “Incontinence medical supplies” means disposable medical supplies that are covered benefits under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to subdivision (s) of Section 14132 when prescribed by a physician for the treatment of individuals who are incontinent. Incontinence medical supplies include, but are not limited to, disposable
 diapers, briefs, underpads, undergarments, liners or pads, pant and pad systems, and skin care products.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Health Services.

(c) “Manufacturer” means any person, partnership, or corporation who assembles or combines the components of incontinence supplies into a final product sold to dealers.

(d) “Principal labeler” means any person, partnership, or corporation who purchases from a manufacturer an assembled product which is sold to dealers under the principal labeler’s label.

(e) “Dealer” means any person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that is recognized by the manufacturer or principal labeler as a provider or retail outlet for its line of incontinence medical supplies, and which provide these
 supplies directly to consumers. The term “dealer” includes a retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 112.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14125.2.

(a) (1) To qualify for Medi-Cal coverage a product shall be in general retail distribution, sold to the general public, and comply with any standards for products established by law or regulation. No product that is manufactured, distributed, or otherwise promoted for the exclusive use of beneficiaries of the Medi-Cal program shall be a Medi-Cal benefit.

(2) For purposes of this section, “product” means any product which is in general retail
 distribution.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “general retail distribution” means either of the following:

(A) The product is included in a listing of approved products for purchase either by the federal or state government.

(B) The product is on display and available for purchase by customers for private payment at licensed pharmacies or licensed medical supply dealers within California which are physical locations open to the general public.

(b) In order to qualify as a Medi-Cal provider of incontinence medical supplies, a dealer shall have an established place of business that is readily identifiable as a medical supply business, be open to the general public at regularly established business hours, have incontinence supplies in stock on the
 premises or in a warehouse under the provider’s direct control, and meet all local laws and ordinances regarding business licensing and operations. The department shall establish additional rules and regulations for participation in the Medi-Cal program as it deems necessary to ensure adequate safeguards to the integrity of the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 79.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14125.3.

The department shall reduce the weighted average of the negotiated contract prices within each product category in effect on June 30, 1992, as follows:

(a) For all premium underpads, as defined by the department, by 24 percent.

(b) For all other incontinence medical supply products, as defined by the department, by 14 percent.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1106, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14125.4.

(a) No later than January 1, 1994, the department shall establish utilization controls that limit expenditures for incontinence medical supplies per beneficiary to no more than one hundred sixty-five dollars ($165) per month. Incontinence creams and washes shall be excluded from this limitation. The expenditure limit established by this section may be adjusted in the annual Budget Act to reflect changes in wholesale prices. These utilization controls shall be published in provider bulletins.

(b) The department shall, by prior authorization, allow a beneficiary to exceed the utilization limits established by this section when justified to the department’s satisfaction not later than January 1, 1994.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no regulations shall be necessary to define the incontinence medical supplies subject to the reductions required in Section 14125.3, or to establish and implement the utilization controls required in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 813, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14125.8.

(a) In order to more fully identify the owner or owners of companies or corporations that apply to be or currently are providers of incontinence medical supplies, within 30 days of the receipt of a request from the department, or a request to the department from the Department of Justice, the applicant or provider shall provide, as part of the application process or as a condition of continued participation in the Medi-Cal program, the following:

(1) The name of the
 corporation, the official titles of the applicants, and a list of all the corporate officers.

(2) The California driver’s license or California identification card number of the applicants, coowners, corporate officers, and financially interested parties.

(3) The applicant’s business permit control number, issued by the State Board of Equalization, for the business location where services are rendered to the public.

(4) A statement of all current sources of capital, identity of all investors, disclosure of all manufacturers, suppliers, and providers currently doing business with the applicant, and disclosure of all entities to whom the applicant has extended a line of credit.

(5) A statement certifying that all information supplied pursuant to this
 section is accurate.

(b) A Medi-Cal provider of incontinence supplies shall not submit a claim for goods or services to the department prior to the date the goods or services are delivered to the Medi-Cal beneficiary. The date of delivery to a beneficiary shall be the earlier of the date the beneficiary actually received the goods or services, or the date the goods were posted or otherwise dispatched from the provider’s premises and control. A claim submitted to the department prior to the date of delivery shall not be paid. Violation of this subdivision shall be grounds for expulsion from the Medi-Cal program.

(c) The department may implement a 180-day moratorium on the enrollment of new providers or new business addresses for incontinence medical supply dealers when the department determines this action is necessary to safeguard public funds or to maintain the fiscal integrity
 of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 80.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14125.9.

Nothing in this article shall be interpreted as limiting or interfering in any way with the department’s authority to contract for the provision of incontinence medical supplies pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14105.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 705.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.8. Medi-Cal Long-Term Care Reimbursement Act [14126. - 14126.036.]

14126.

This article shall be known as the Medi-Cal Long-Term Care Reimbursement Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 875, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.02.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to devise a Medi-Cal long-term care reimbursement methodology that more effectively ensures individual access to appropriate long-term care services, promotes quality resident care, advances decent wages and benefits for nursing home workers, supports provider compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements, and encourages administrative
 efficiency.

(b) The department shall implement a facility-specific ratesetting system, subject to federal approval and the availability of federal funds, that reflects the costs and staffing levels associated with quality of care for residents in nursing facilities, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, except that the ratesetting system shall not apply to a unit that provides pediatric subacute services in a skilled nursing facility, or to a skilled nursing facility that is designated as an institution for mental diseases, as defined in Section 1396d(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code. The facility-specific ratesetting system shall be effective commencing on August 1, 2005, and shall be implemented commencing on the first day of the month following federal approval. The department may retroactively increase and make payment of rates to facilities.

(c) In implementing this section, the department may contract as necessary, on a bid or nonbid basis, for professional consulting services from nationally recognized higher education and research institutions, or other qualified individuals and entities not associated with a skilled nursing facility, with demonstrated expertise in long-term care reimbursement systems. The ratesetting system specified in subdivision (b) shall be developed with all possible expedience. This subdivision establishes an accelerated process for issuing contracts pursuant to this section and contracts entered into pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) The department shall implement a facility-specific ratesetting system by August 1, 2004, subject to federal approval and
 availability of federal or other funds, that reflects the costs and staffing levels associated with quality of care for residents in hospital-based nursing facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 508, Sec. 8.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.021.

The department shall develop and implement a cost-based reimbursement rate methodology using the cost categories as described in Section 14126.023, for freestanding nursing facilities pursuant to this article, excluding nursing facilities that are a distinct part of a facility that is licensed as a general acute care hospital as identified pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14126.02. The cost-based reimbursement rate
 methodology shall be effective on August 1, 2005, and shall be implemented on the first day of the month following federal approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 875, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.023.

(a) The methodology developed pursuant to this article shall be facility specific and reflect the sum of the projected cost of each cost category and passthrough costs, as follows:

(1) Labor costs limited as specified in subdivisions (d) and (e).

(2) Indirect care nonlabor costs limited to the 75th percentile.

(3) (A) Administrative costs limited to the 50th percentile.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), beginning with the 2010–11 rate year and in each subsequent rate or calendar year, the administrative cost category shall exclude any legal and
 consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing or other litigation against or involving any governmental agency or department until all issues related to the fair hearing or litigation issues are ultimately decided or resolved.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), beginning with the 2010–11 rate year and in each subsequent rate or calendar year, the department shall not allow any cost associated with legal or consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing or other litigation against any governmental agency or department if any of the following apply:

(i) A decision has been rendered in favor of the governmental agency or department.

(ii) The determination of the governmental agency or department otherwise stands.

(iii) A settlement or similar
 resolution has been reached on any citation issued under subdivision (c), (d), or (e) of Section 1424 of the Health and Safety Code or on any remedy imposed under Subpart F of Part 489 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(iv) A settlement or similar resolution has been reached under Section 14123 or 14171.

(D) Facilities shall report supplemental data required to disallow costs described in subparagraph (C) in a format and by the deadline determined by the department.

(4) Capital costs based on a fair rental value system (FRVS) limited as specified in subdivision (f).

(5) (A) Direct passthrough of proportional Medi-Cal costs for property taxes, facility license fees, new state and federal mandates, caregiver training
 costs, and liability insurance projected on the prior year’s costs.

(i) Eligible caregiver training costs include any and all trainings that enhance the skills, education, or career advancement for nursing home workers.

(ii) Trainings provided through a joint labor-management Taft-Hartley fund are eligible for the direct pass through of proportional Medi-Cal costs.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for the 2010–11 rate year and each rate or calendar year thereafter, professional liability insurance costs, including any insurance deductible costs paid by the facility, shall be limited to the 75th percentile computed on a specific geographic peer group basis.

(ii) Facilities shall report supplemental data described in this
 subparagraph in a format and by the deadline determined by the department, or the insurance deductible costs shall continue to be reimbursed in the administrative cost category.

(b) (1) The percentiles in paragraphs (1) through (3) of subdivision (a) shall be based on annualized costs divided by total resident days and computed on a specific geographic peer group basis. Costs within a specific cost category shall not be shifted to any other cost category.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for the 2010–11 rate year, and each rate or calendar year thereafter, the percentiles in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be based on annualized audited costs divided by total resident days and computed on a specific geographic peer group basis. Costs within a specific category shall not be shifted to any other cost category.

(3) Effective August 1, 2020, the department shall continue to establish the specific geographic peer groups on the basis of, but need not be limited to, similar or common facility characteristics as determined by the department in consultation with stakeholders. The department may periodically review and change the number and assignment of peer groups and the peer group placement of an individual facility. Peer group assignments shall be effective for the duration of the rate or calendar year.

(c) (1) Facilities newly certified to participate in the Medi-Cal program shall receive a reimbursement rate based on the peer group weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate. Facilities shall continue to receive the peer group weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate until either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The department shall calculate the Freestanding Skilled Nursing Facility-B facility specific rate when a minimum of six months of Medi-Cal cost data has been audited. The facility specific rate shall be calculated prospectively and shall be effective on August 1 of each rate year or January 1 of each calendar year period, as applicable, pursuant to Section 14126.021.

(B) The department shall calculate the Freestanding Subacute Skilled Nursing Facility-B facility specific rate when a cost report with a minimum of 12 months of Medi-Cal cost data has been audited. The facility specific rate shall be calculated prospectively and shall be effective on August 1 of each rate year or January 1 of each calendar year period, as applicable, pursuant to Section 14126.021.

(2) Facilities that have been decertified for less than six
 months and upon recertification shall continue to receive the facility per diem reimbursement rate in effect prior to decertification. Facilities shall continue to receive the facility per diem reimbursement rate until either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The department shall calculate the Freestanding Skilled Nursing Facility-B facility specific rate when a minimum of six months of Medi-Cal cost data has been audited. The facility specific rate based on the audited six months of Medi-Cal cost data shall be calculated prospectively and shall be effective on August 1 of each rate year or January 1 of each calendar year period, as applicable, pursuant to Section 14126.021.

(B) The department shall calculate the Freestanding Subacute Skilled Nursing Facility-B facility specific rate when a cost report with a minimum of 12 months of Medi-Cal cost data has been audited. The
 facility-specific rate shall be calculated prospectively and shall be effective on August 1 of each rate year or January 1 of each calendar year period, as applicable, pursuant to Section 14126.021.

(3) Facilities that have been decertified for six months or longer and upon recertification shall receive a reimbursement rate based on the peer group weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate. Facilities shall continue to receive the peer group weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate until either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The department shall calculate the Freestanding Skilled Nursing Facility-B facility specific rate when a minimum of six months of Medi-Cal cost data has been audited. The facility-specific rate shall be calculated prospectively and shall be effective on August 1 of each rate year or January 1 of each calendar year period, as applicable, pursuant
 to Section 14126.021.

(B) The department shall calculate the Freestanding Subacute Skilled Nursing Facility-B facility specific rate when a cost report with a minimum of 12 months of Medi-Cal cost data has been audited. The facility-specific rate shall be calculated prospectively and shall be effective on August 1 of each rate year or January 1 of each calendar year period, as applicable, pursuant to Section 14126.021.

(4) Facilities that have a change of ownership or change of the licensed operator shall continue to receive the facility per diem reimbursement rate in effect with the previous owner. Facilities shall continue to receive the facility per diem reimbursement rate until either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The department shall calculate the Freestanding Skilled Nursing Facility-B facility
 specific rate when a minimum of six months of Medi-Cal cost data has been audited. The facility-specific rate shall be calculated prospectively and shall be effective on August 1 of each rate year or January 1 of each calendar year period, as applicable, pursuant to Section 14126.021.

(B) The department shall calculate the Freestanding Subacute Skilled Nursing Facility B facility-specific rate when a cost report with a minimum of 12 months of Medi-Cal cost data has been audited. The facility-specific rate shall be calculated prospectively and shall be effective on August 1 of each rate year or January 1 of each calendar year period, as applicable, pursuant to Section 14126.021.

(d) The labor costs category shall be comprised of a direct resident care labor cost category, an indirect care labor cost category, and a labor-driven operating allocation cost category, as follows:

(1) Direct resident care labor cost category, which shall include all labor costs related to routine nursing services including all nursing, social services, activities, and other direct care personnel. These costs shall be limited to the 90th percentile through the conclusion of the 2019–20 rate year. Beginning for the rate period of August 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, and each subsequent calendar year thereafter, these costs shall be limited to the 95th percentile.

(2) Indirect care labor cost category, which shall include all labor costs related to staff supporting the delivery of patient care including, but not limited to, housekeeping, laundry and linen, dietary, medical records, inservice education, and plant operations and maintenance. These costs shall be limited to the 90th percentile through the conclusion of the 2019–20 rate year. Beginning for the rate period
 of August 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, and each subsequent calendar year thereafter for which this article is operative, these costs shall be limited to the 95th percentile.

(3) Labor-driven operating allocation shall include an amount equal to 8 percent of labor costs, minus expenditures for temporary staffing, which may be used to cover allowable Medi-Cal expenditures. In no instance shall the operating allocation exceed 5 percent of the facility’s total Medi-Cal reimbursement rate.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), beginning with the 2010–11 rate year and each rate or calendar year thereafter, the labor cost category shall not include the labor-driven operating allocation and shall be comprised only of a direct resident care labor cost category and an indirect care labor cost category.

(f) The
 capital cost category shall be based on a FRVS that recognizes the value of the capital related assets necessary to care for Medi-Cal residents. The capital cost category includes mortgage principal and interest, leases, leasehold improvements, depreciation of real property, equipment, and other capital related expenses. The FRVS methodology shall be based on the formula developed by the department that assesses facility value based on age and condition and uses a recognized market interest factor. Capital investment and improvement expenditures included in the FRVS formula shall be documented in cost reports or supplemental reports required by the department. The capital costs based on FRVS shall be limited as follows:

(1) For the 2005–06 rate year, the capital cost category for all facilities in the aggregate shall not exceed the department’s estimated value for this cost category for the 2004–05 rate year.

(2) For the 2006–07 rate year and subsequent rate years, the maximum annual increase for the capital cost category for all facilities in the aggregate shall not exceed 8 percent of the prior rate year’s FRVS cost component.

(3) If the total capital costs for all facilities in the aggregate for the 2005–06 rate year exceeds the value of the capital costs for all facilities in the aggregate for the 2004–05 rate year, or if that capital cost category for all facilities in the aggregate for the 2006–07 rate year or any rate year thereafter exceeds 8 percent of the prior rate year’s value, the department shall reduce the capital cost category for all facilities in equal proportion in order to comply with paragraphs (1) and (2).

(g) For the 2005–06 and 2006–07 rate years, the facility specific Medi-Cal reimbursement rate
 calculated under this article shall not be less than the Medi-Cal rate that the specific facility would have received under the rate methodology in effect as of July 31, 2005, plus Medi-Cal’s projected proportional costs for new state or federal mandates for rate years 2005–06 and 2006–07, respectively.

(h) The department shall annually update each facility specific rate calculated under this methodology. The update process shall be prescribed in the Medicaid State Plan, regulations, and the provider bulletins or similar instructions described in Section 14126.027, and shall be adjusted in accordance with the results of facility specific audit and review findings in accordance with subdivisions (i), (j), and (k).

(i) (1) The department shall establish rates pursuant to this article on the basis of facility cost data reported in the integrated long-term care
 disclosure and Medi-Cal cost report required by Section 128730 of the Health and Safety Code for the most recent reporting period available, and cost data reported in other facility financial disclosure reports or supplemental information required by the department in order to implement this article.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), or any other law, beginning with the 2010–11 rate year, and each rate or calendar year thereafter, the department shall establish rates pursuant to this article on the basis of facility audited cost data pursuant to subdivision (c), reported in the integrated long-term care disclosure and Medi-Cal cost report described in Section 128730 of the Health and Safety Code and audited cost data reported in other facility financial disclosure reports or audited supplemental information required by the department in order to implement this article.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), or any other law, beginning with the 2010–11 rate year through December 31, 2022, the department may determine a facility ineligible to receive supplemental payments pursuant to Section 14126.022 if a facility fails to provide supplemental data as requested by the department.

(j) The department shall conduct financial audits of facility and home office cost data as follows:

(1) The department shall audit facilities a minimum of once every three years to ensure accuracy of reported costs.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
 department develop and implement limited scope audits of key cost centers or categories to assure that the rate paid in the years between each full scope audit required in paragraph (1) accurately reflects actual costs.

(3) For purposes of updating facility specific rates, the department shall adjust or reclassify costs reported consistent with applicable requirements of the Medicaid state plan as required by Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) Overpayments to any facility shall be recovered in a manner consistent with applicable recovery procedures and requirements of state and federal laws and regulations.

(k) (1) On an annual basis, the department shall use the results of audits performed pursuant to subdivisions (i) and (j), the
 results of any federal audits, and facility cost reports, including supplemental reports of actual costs incurred in specific cost centers or categories as required by the department, to determine any difference between reported costs used to calculate a facility’s rate and audited facility expenditures in the rate year.

(2) If the department determines that there is a difference between reported costs and audited facility expenditures pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall adjust a facility’s reimbursement prospectively over the intervening years between audits by an amount that reflects the difference, consistent with the methodology specified in this article.

(l) For nursing facilities that obtain an audit appeal decision that results in revision of the facility’s allowable costs, the facility shall be entitled to seek a retroactive adjustment in its facility
 specific reimbursement rate.

(m) Except as provided in Section 14126.022, compliance by each facility with state laws and regulations on staffing levels shall be documented annually either through facility cost reports, including supplemental reports, or through the annual licensing inspection process specified in Section 1422 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 46, Sec. 8.   (AB 186)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.    Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.024.

(a) For managed care rating periods that begin between January 1, 2023, and December 31, 2025, inclusive, the department, in consultation with representatives from the long-term care industry, organized labor, consumer advocates, and Medi-Cal managed care plans, shall establish and implement the Workforce and Quality Incentive Program under which a network provider furnishing skilled nursing facility services to a Medi-Cal managed care enrollee may earn performance-based directed payments from the Medi-Cal managed care plan they contract with in accordance with this section.

(b) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Set the amount of performance-based directed payments to target an aggregate amount of two hundred eighty million dollars ($280,000,000) for the 2023 calendar year.

(2) For the 2024 through 2025 calendar years, the department shall set the amount of the performance-based directed payments to target the previous calendar year’s target plus the annual increase specified by clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraphs (18), (19), and (20) of subdivision (c) of Section 14126.033.

(3) No
 sooner than December 31, 2023, the department shall make a one-time increase to the performance-based directed payment target amount by the amounts described in subdivision (f) of Section 14126.032. This one-time increase shall not be factored into the amount calculated for a subsequent calendar year pursuant to paragraph (2).

(c) The department, in consultation with stakeholders listed in subdivision (a), shall establish the methodology or methodologies, parameters, and eligibility criteria for the directed payments pursuant to this section. This shall include, but is not limited to, the milestones and metrics that network providers of skilled nursing facility services must meet in order to receive a directed payment from a Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to this section, with at least two of these milestones and metrics tied to workforce measures. Subject to subdivision (j), the department may implement the directed payment described in
 this section using one or more of the models authorized at Section 438.6(c)(1)(i)-(iii), inclusive, of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) A freestanding pediatric subacute care facility, as defined in Section 51215.8 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be exempt from the directed payments described in this section.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, special program services for the mentally disordered that are entitled to receive the supplemental payment under Section 51511.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations shall be exempt from the directed payments described in this section.

(f) Directed payments made pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other payments made by the a Medi-Cal managed care plan to applicable network providers of skilled nursing
 facility services and shall not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable by a Medi-Cal managed care plan to a provider of skilled nursing facility services, including those payments made in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14184.201.

(g) For managed care rating periods during which this section is implemented, capitation rates paid by the department to a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be actuarially sound and shall account for the directed payments described in this section.

(h) The department may require Medi-Cal managed care plans and network providers of skilled nursing facility services to submit information the department deems necessary to implement this section, at the times and in the form and manner specified by the department.

(i) Payments pursuant to this section shall
 be made in accordance with the requirements for directed payment arrangements described in Section 438.6(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any associated federal guidance.

(j) In implementing this section, the department may contract, as necessary, with California’s Medicare Quality Improvement Organization, or other entities deemed qualified by the department, not associated with a skilled nursing facility, to assist with development, collection, analysis, and reporting of the performance data pursuant to this section. The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of implementing this subdivision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2
 of the Public Contract Code, and State Administrative Manual, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the State Department of General Services.

(k) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(l) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.

(2) “Network provider” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) “Skilled nursing facility” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, excluding a nursing facility that is a distinct part of a facility that is licensed as a general acute care hospital as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(m) (1) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026. The department may conduct all necessary closeout activities applicable to any managed care rating period before January 1, 2026.

(2) This section shall be repealed on January 1, 2027, or on the date that the director certifies to the Secretary of State that all necessary closeout activities have been completed pursuant to paragraph (1), whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 99.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed on or after January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.025.

(a) The department shall seek approval of an amendment to the Medicaid state plan specifically outlining the reimbursement methodology developed pursuant to this article not later than February 1, 2005.

(b) The amendment to the Medicaid state plan pursuant to subdivision (a), and any regulations, provider bulletins, or other similar
 instructions, shall be prepared in consultation with representatives of the long-term care industry, organized labor, seniors, and consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 875, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.026.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and in addition to any other remedial action available to the department, if a skilled nursing facility fails to meet or exceed one or more of the measures developed by the department, including, but not limited to, those developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14126.024, the department may assess sanctions as described in this section.

(b) (1) For each measure a skilled nursing facility fails to meet or exceed in a single rating period, the department may assess a sanction of five dollars ($5) for each Medi-Cal bed day within the rating period.

(2) For each measure a skilled nursing facility fails to meet or
 exceed, the department shall not assess an aggregate sanction that exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in a single rating period.

(c) The director may identify findings of noncompliance through any means, including, but not limited to, findings in audits, investigations, compliance reviews, quality improvement monitoring, routine monitoring, facility site surveys, encounter and provider data submissions, grievances and appeals, reviews of utilization data, fair hearing decisions, complaints from beneficiaries and other stakeholders, whistleblowers, and self-disclosures.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the amount of the assessed sanction, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (b), for a skilled nursing facility may be deducted by the department from any Medi-Cal payments to that facility until the sanction is paid in full. If the department deducts the sanction
 from the Medi-Cal payments to the facility, the department shall provide prior written notice to the facility, and, in taking into account the financial condition of the facility, may apply that deduction over a period of time.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, if there is a merger, acquisition, or change of ownership involving a skilled nursing facility that has an outstanding sanction pursuant to this section, the successor skilled nursing facility shall be responsible for paying to the department the full amount of the outstanding sanction attributable to the facility for which it was assessed, upon the effective date of that transaction.

(f) The department may waive all or a portion of the sanction assessed under this section if a facility petitions for a waiver and the department determines, in its sole discretion, that the petitioning facility meets both of the
 following:

(1) The facility has demonstrated to the department’s satisfaction that sufficient corrective action has been taken to remediate the underlying deficiency.

(2) The facility has demonstrated to the department’s satisfaction that imposing the full amount of the sanction under this section has a high likelihood of creating an undue financial hardship for that facility or creates a significant difficulty in providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.
